Louisiana, session 2026, HB659.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3518.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3518.5. Credit and debit cards; maximum fee or surcharge allowed
A. No seller or lessor in a sales or lease transaction may impose a fee or
surcharge on a buyer or lessee in this state who elects to pay by credit or debit card
in lieu of cash or check greater than two percent of the total transaction amount, or
twenty dollars, whichever is less.
B. A seller or lessor who imposes a fee or surcharge as provided in
Subsection A of this Section shall post a clear and conspicuous disclosure stating the
fee or surcharge imposed for payment by credit or debit card at the point of entry, the
point of sale, and on a receipt, if any. For online transactions, the fee shall be clearly
displayed before checkout.
C. The provisions of this Section do not apply to the state or its political
subdivisions.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1087 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 659